Illinois, session 104th, SB2048.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Sections 50-10, 50-75, and 60-35 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-10)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 50-10. Definitions. Each of the following terms, when 9used in this Act, shall have the meaning ascribed to it in this 10Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:11    "Academic year" means the customary annual schedule of 12courses at a college, university, or approved school, 13customarily regarded as the school year as distinguished from 14the calendar year.15    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 16by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 17file or license file as maintained by the Department's 18licensure maintenance unit.19    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 20person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 21nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 22(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv) 23clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and has been licensed by the   SB2048- 2 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1Department. All advanced practice registered nurses licensed 2and practicing in the State of Illinois shall use the title 3APRN and may use specialty credentials CNM, CNP, CRNA, or CNS 4after their name. All advanced practice registered nurses may 5only practice in accordance with national certification and 6this Act. 7    "Advisory Board" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce 8Center Advisory Board.9    "Approved program of professional nursing education" and 10"approved program of practical nursing education" are programs 11of professional or practical nursing, respectively, approved 12by the Department under the provisions of this Act.13    "Board" means the Board of Nursing appointed by the 14Secretary.15    "Center" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center.16    "Collaboration" means a process involving 2 or more health 17care professionals working together, each contributing one's 18respective area of expertise to provide more comprehensive 19patient care.20    "Competence" means an expected and measurable level of 21performance that integrates knowledge, skills, abilities, and 22judgment based on established scientific knowledge and 23expectations for nursing practice. 24    "Comprehensive nursing assessment" means the gathering of 25information about the patient's physiological, psychological, 26sociological, and spiritual status on an ongoing basis by a   SB2048- 3 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1registered professional nurse and is the first step in 2implementing and guiding the nursing plan of care. 3    "Consultation" means the process whereby an advanced 4practice registered nurse seeks the advice or opinion of 5another health care professional.6    "Credentialed" means the process of assessing and 7validating the qualifications of a health care professional.8    "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry 9under the Illinois Dental Practice Act.10    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 11Professional Regulation.12    "Email address of record" means the designated email 13address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 14application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 15by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.16    "Focused nursing assessment" means an appraisal of an 17individual's status and current situation, contributing to the 18comprehensive nursing assessment performed by the registered 19professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse or 20the assessment by the physician assistant, physician, dentist, 21podiatric physician, or other licensed health care 22professional, as determined by the Department, supporting 23ongoing data collection, and deciding who needs to be informed 24of the information and when to inform. 25    "Full practice authority" means the authority of an 26advanced practice registered nurse licensed in Illinois and   SB2048- 4 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1certified as a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, 2or nurse midwife to practice without a written collaborative 3agreement and: 4        (1) to be fully accountable to patients for the 5    quality of advanced nursing care rendered; 6        (2) to be fully accountable for recognizing limits of 7    knowledge and experience and for planning for the 8    management of situations beyond the advanced practice 9    registered nurse's expertise; the full practice authority 10    for advanced practice registered nurses includes accepting 11    referrals from, consulting with, collaborating with, or 12    referring to other health care professionals as warranted 13    by the needs of the patient; and 14        (3) to possess the authority to prescribe medications, 15    including Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 16    provided in Section 65-43. 17    "Full practice authority-pending advanced practice 18registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse 19licensed in Illinois and certified as a nurse practitioner, 20clinical nurse specialist, or nurse midwife who has provided a 21notarized attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of 22continuing education or training in the advanced practice 23registered nurse's area of certification and at least 4,000 24hours of clinical experience after first attaining national 25certification and who has submitted an application to the 26Department to be granted full practice authority.   SB2048- 5 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 2joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 3organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 4to the provision, management, or support of health care 5services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 6controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. For 7the purposes of this definition, "control" means having at 8least an equal or a majority ownership or membership interest. 9A hospital affiliate shall be 100% owned or controlled by any 10combination of hospitals, their parent corporations, or 11physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 12in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" does not include a health 13maintenance organization regulated under the Health 14Maintenance Organization Act. 15    "Impaired nurse" means a nurse licensed under this Act who 16is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety because 17of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written 18determination or written consent based on clinical evidence, 19including loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or alcohol, or a 20psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to diminish his or 21her ability to deliver competent patient care.22    "License-pending advanced practice registered nurse" means 23a registered professional nurse who has completed all 24requirements for licensure as an advanced practice registered 25nurse except the certification examination and has applied to 26take the next available certification exam and received a   SB2048- 6 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1temporary permit from the Department.2    "License-pending registered nurse" means a person who has 3passed the Department-approved registered nurse licensure exam 4and has applied for a license from the Department. A 5license-pending registered nurse shall use the title "RN lic 6pend" on all documentation related to nursing practice.7    "Nursing intervention" means any treatment based on 8clinical nursing judgment or knowledge that a nurse performs. 9An individual or entity shall not mandate that a registered 10professional nurse delegate nursing interventions if the 11registered professional nurse determines it is inappropriate 12to do so. A nurse shall not be subject to disciplinary or any 13other adverse action for refusing to delegate a nursing 14intervention based on patient safety. 15    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 16in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.17    "Podiatric physician" means a person licensed to practice 18podiatry under the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 19    "Practical nurse" or "licensed practical nurse" means a 20person who is licensed as a practical nurse under this Act and 21practices practical nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 22practical nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use the 23title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation 24"L.P.N.".25    "Practical nursing" means the performance of nursing 26interventions requiring the nursing knowledge, judgment, and   SB2048- 7 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1skill acquired by means of completion of an approved practical 2nursing education program. Practical nursing includes 3assisting in the nursing process under the guidance of a 4registered professional nurse or an advanced practice 5registered nurse. The practical nurse may work under the 6direction of a licensed physician, dentist, podiatric 7physician, or other health care professional determined by the 8Department.9    "Privileged" means the authorization granted by the 10governing body of a healthcare facility, agency, or 11organization to provide specific patient care services within 12well-defined limits, based on qualifications reviewed in the 13credentialing process. 14    "Registered Nurse" or "Registered Professional Nurse" 15means a person who is licensed as a professional nurse under 16this Act and practices nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 17registered nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use 18the titles "registered nurse" and "registered professional 19nurse" and the abbreviation, "R.N.".20    "Registered professional nursing practice" means a 21scientific process founded on a professional body of knowledge 22that includes, but is not limited to, the protection, 23promotion, and optimization of health and abilities, 24prevention of illness and injury, development and 25implementation of the nursing plan of care, facilitation of 26nursing interventions to alleviate suffering, care   SB2048- 8 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1coordination, and advocacy in the care of individuals, 2families, groups, communities, and populations. "Registered 3professional nursing practice" does not include the act of 4medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or 5corrective measures. Registered professional nursing practice 6is a scientific process founded on a professional body of 7knowledge. It is a learned profession based on the 8understanding of the human condition across the life span and 9environment, includes all nursing specialties, and means the 10performance of any nursing act based upon professional 11knowledge, judgment, and skills acquired by means of 12completion of an approved professional nursing education 13program. A registered professional nurse provides holistic 14nursing care through the nursing process to individuals, 15groups, families, or communities, that includes, but is not 16limited to: (i) the assessment of healthcare needs, nursing 17diagnosis, planning, implementation, and nursing evaluation; 18(ii) the promotion, maintenance, and restoration of health; 19(iii) counseling, patient education, health education, and 20patient advocacy; (iv) the administration of medications and 21treatments as prescribed by a physician licensed to practice 22medicine in all of its branches, a licensed dentist, a 23licensed podiatric physician, or a licensed optometrist or as 24prescribed by a physician assistant or by an advanced practice 25nurse; (v) the coordination and management of the nursing plan 26of care; (vi) the delegation to and supervision of individuals   SB2048- 9 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1who assist the registered professional nurse implementing the 2plan of care; and (vii) teaching nursing students. 3    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 4professional assistance program that meets criteria 5established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 6Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 7approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 8practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 9addiction.10    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 11Professional Regulation.12    "Unencumbered license" means a license issued in good 13standing.14    "Written collaborative agreement" means a written 15agreement between an advanced practice registered nurse and a 16collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric physician 17pursuant to Section 65-35. 18(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    (225 ILCS 65/50-75)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)21    Sec. 50-75. Nursing delegation by a registered 22professional nurse.23    (a) For the purposes of this Section:24    "Delegation" means transferring to a specific individual 25the authority to perform a specific nursing intervention or   SB2048- 10 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1task in a specific situation.2    "Predictability of outcomes" means that a registered 3professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse has 4determined that the patient's or individual's clinical status 5is stable and expected to improve or the patient's or 6individual's deteriorating condition is expected to follow a 7known or expected course. 8    "Stability" means a registered professional nurse or 9advanced practice registered nurse has determined that the 10individual's clinical status and nursing care needs are 11consistent. 12    "Task" means work not requiring nursing knowledge, 13judgment, or decision making, as defined by the Department by 14rule. 15    (b) This Section authorizes a registered professional 16nurse to:17        (1) delegate nursing interventions and tasks to other 18    registered professional nurses and , licensed practical 19    nurses based on the comprehensive nursing assessment that 20    includes, but is not limited to:21            (A) the stability and condition of the patient;22            (B) the potential for harm;23            (C) the complexity of the nursing intervention or 24        task to be delegated;25            (D) the predictability of outcomes; and26            (E) the competency of the individual to whom the   SB2048- 11 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1        nursing intervention or task is delegated; 2        (2) delegate tasks to , and other unlicensed personnel 3    based on the comprehensive nursing assessment that 4    includes, but is not limited to:5            (A) the stability and condition of the patient;6            (B) the potential for harm;7            (C) the complexity of the task nursing 8        intervention to be delegated;9            (D) the predictability of outcomes; and10            (E) competency of the individual to whom the task 11        nursing intervention is delegated;12        (3) (2) delegate medication administration to other 13    licensed nurses; or 14        (3) in community-based or in-home care settings, 15    delegate the administration of medication (limited to oral 16    or subcutaneous dosage and topical or transdermal 17    application) to unlicensed personnel, if all the 18    conditions for delegation set forth in this Section are 19    met; 20        (4) refuse to delegate, stop, or rescind a previously 21    authorized delegation. ; or22        (5) in community-based or in-home care settings, 23    delegate, guide, and evaluate the implementation of 24    nursing interventions as a component of patient care 25    coordination after completion of the comprehensive patient 26    assessment based on analysis of the comprehensive nursing   SB2048- 12 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1    assessment data; care coordination in in-home care and 2    school settings may occur in person, by telecommunication, 3    or by electronic communication. 4    (c) This Section prohibits the following:5        (1) An individual or entity from mandating that a 6    registered professional nurse delegate nursing 7    interventions if the registered professional nurse 8    determines it is inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not 9    be subject to disciplinary or any other adverse action for 10    refusing to delegate a nursing intervention based on 11    patient safety.12        (2) The delegation of medication administration to 13    unlicensed personnel in any institutional or long-term 14    facility, including, but not limited to, those facilities 15    licensed by the Hospital Licensing Act, the University of 16    Illinois Hospital Act, State-operated mental health 17    hospitals, or State-operated developmental centers, except 18    as authorized under Article 80 of this Act or otherwise 19    specifically authorized by law.20        (2.5) A registered professional nurse from delegating 21    work requiring nursing knowledge, assessment, judgment, 22    inference, decision making (including medication 23    administration), the development of a plan of care, and 24    evaluation of a plan of care to unlicensed non-nurse 25    personnel. 26        (3) A registered professional nurse from delegating   SB2048- 13 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1    nursing judgment, the comprehensive patient assessment, 2    the development of a plan of care, and the evaluation of 3    care to licensed or unlicensed personnel.4        (4) A licensed practical nurse or unlicensed personnel 5    who has been delegated a nursing intervention or task from 6    re-delegating a nursing intervention or task.7        (5) Unlicensed personnel who have been delegated tasks 8    from redelegating the tasks9    (d) A registered professional nurse may delegate tasks to 10other licensed and unlicensed persons.11(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 100-1160, eff. 6-1-19.) 12    (225 ILCS 65/60-35)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)14    Sec. 60-35. RN scope of practice. The RN scope of nursing 15practice is the protection, promotion, and optimization of 16health and abilities, the prevention of illness and injury, 17the development and implementation of the nursing plan of 18care, the facilitation of nursing interventions to alleviate 19suffering, care coordination, and advocacy in the care of 20individuals, families, groups, communities, and populations. 21Practice as a registered professional nurse means this full 22scope of nursing, with or without compensation, that 23incorporates caring for all patients in all settings, through 24nursing standards of practice and professional performance for 25coordination of care, and may include, but is not limited to,   SB2048- 14 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1all of the following: 2        (1) Collecting pertinent data and information relative 3    to the patient's health or the situation on an ongoing 4    basis through the comprehensive nursing assessment.5        (2) Analyzing comprehensive nursing assessment data to 6    determine actual or potential diagnoses, problems, and 7    issues.8        (3) Identifying expected outcomes for a plan 9    individualized to the patient or the situation that 10    prescribes strategies to attain expected, measurable 11    outcomes.12        (4) Implementing the identified plan, coordinating 13    care delivery, employing strategies to promote healthy and 14    safe environments, and administering or delegating 15    medication administration according to Section 50-75 of 16    this Act.17        (5) Evaluating patient progress toward attainment of 18    goals and outcomes.19        (6) Delegating nursing interventions and tasks to 20    licensed nurses to implement the plan of care.21        (6.5) Delegating tasks to unlicensed personnel to 22    implement the plan of care. 23        (7) Providing health education and counseling.24        (7.5) Advocating for the patient. 25        (8) Practicing ethically according to the American 26    Nurses Association Code of Ethics.  SB2048- 15 -LRB104 10051 AAS 20122 b1        (9) Practicing in a manner that recognizes cultural 2    diversity.3        (10) Communicating effectively in all areas of 4    practice.5        (11) Collaborating with patients and other key 6    stakeholders in the conduct of nursing practice.7        (12) Participating in continuous professional 8    development.9        (13) Teaching the theory and practice of nursing to 10    student nurses.11        (14) Leading within the professional practice setting 12    and the profession.13        (15) Contributing to quality nursing practice.14        (16) Integrating evidence and research findings into 15    practice.16        (17) Utilizing appropriate resources to plan, provide, 17    and sustain evidence-based nursing services that are safe 18    and effective.19(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect August 211, 2025.